Utah statutes.
7-1-602.   Final settlement of transaction account -- Limitation of action
on accuracy of statement -- Duty to examine statement and notify of errors
unaffected.
(1) Two years after a statement of a checking or other transaction account has
been rendered to a depositor, the account shall be considered finally adjusted
and settled and its correctness conclusively presumed as of the date the
statement is rendered.
(2)  The depositor may not maintain an action on the correctness or accuracy
of the statement of account unless it is commenced within two years next after
the date the statement was rendered.
(3)  For the purpose of this section a statement of account shall be
considered rendered if at the time the statement is purported to have been
made, the depository institution in the course of its business regularly
mailed or otherwise delivered to its depositor customers monthly or at other
regular intervals statements of their checking and other transaction accounts,
itemizing debit and credit entries.
(4)  The date the statement is rendered is considered to be the first day of
the month following the period covered by the statement as evidenced by the
record of the account kept by the depository institution.
(5)  Nothing in this section relieves a depositor from the duties imposed
under Section 70A-4-406 to examine the statement of account, when rendered by
the depository institution, and to immediately notify the depository
institution of any errors discovered in it, nor from the legal consequences of
neglect of those duties.
